District of Columbia statutes.
28:11-104

Transition provision on change of requirement of filing.

A security interest for the perfection of which filing or the taking of possession was required under article 9 of this subtitle, effective January 1, 1965, and which attached prior to the effective date of this act (as provided in section 28:11-101 ) but was not perfected shall be deemed perfected on such effective date of this act if this act permits perfection without filing or authorizes filing in the office or offices where a prior ineffective filing was made.

Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-85, § 40, 29 DCR 309
1981 Ed., § 28:11-104.
“This act”, referred to in this section, is D.C. Law 4-85.